Mississippi, session 20251E, SB2016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the support and maintenance of the Department of Mental Health for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026........................................ ............................................ $ 257,779,194.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby authorized for expenditure out of any special source funds which are collected by or otherwise become available for the support and maintenance of the Department of Mental Health for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026 $ 464,922,752.00. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 2 of this act, Twenty Million Nine Hundred Fifty-one Thousand Eight Hundred Eighty-six Dollars ($20,951,886.00) shall be derived from the Health Care Expendable Fund created in Section 43-13-407, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the support and maintenance of the Department of Mental Health.  The funds provided for in this section shall be allocated as follows: $ 16,797,843.00     Expenses of the Department of Mental Health, payment of Medicaid state share, or prepayment of Medicaid state share. $    379,417.00     Alzheimer's disease services development and implementation of Senate Bill No. 2100, 1997 Regular Session. $    636,374.00     Crisis Centers $  2,000,000.00     Fentanyl and drug abuse education program                       pursuant to Section 41-29-323, Mississippi Code of 1972, and the                               Mississippi Collaborative Response to                           Mental Health Act established in House                          Bill No. 1222, 2023 Regular Session $  1,138,252.00     Physician services at community mental health centers. $ 20,951,886.00     TOTAL SECTION 4. Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for Personal Services, which includes Vacancy Funding, for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:              $ 109,267,322.00 Special Funds:              $ 220,756,589.00 Total Funds:                $ 330,023,911.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits:           $ 310,232,739.00 Progressions:               $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:            $  19,791,172.00 Total Personal Services:     $ 330,023,911.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:                   4,968 Time-Limited: 353 As used in this section, the term Personal Services shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits.  Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972. Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. It is the Legislatures intention that no employees salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of Personal Services based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2026 appropriation for Personal Services with the exception of escalated funds. Further, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2026 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agencys Fiscal Year 2026 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change Personal Services, the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2026 or increase the need for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, Vacancy Funding shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2026. These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2025. If the agency fills additional headcounts after May 1, 2025, until the end of Fiscal Year 2025, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally reduced to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts. The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that Vacancy Funding is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act. The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level. Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2025 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Services Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agencys total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2025 to Fiscal Year 2026, it will be the agencys discretion as to what headcounts are removed. SECTION 5.  In compliance with the "Mississippi Performance Budget and Strategic Planning Act of 1994," it is the intent of the Legislature that the funds provided herein shall be utilized in the most efficient and effective manner possible to achieve the intended mission of this agency.  Based on the funding authorized, this agency shall make every effort to attain the targeted performance measures provided below: FY2026 Performance Measures                                       Target Services Management Number of On-Site Reviews Conducted by the Division of Audit                                40 Number of On-Site Reviews Conducted for DMH Certified Provider Agencies                     138 Mental Health Services Percent of Population Lacking Access to Community-Based Mental Health Care                 30.00 Percent of DMH Clients Served in the Community vs. in an Institutional Setting                                          98.00 Increase by at Least 25% the Utilization of Alternative Placement/Treatment Options for Individuals who have had Multiple Hospitalizations & Do Not Respond to Traditional Treatment                  25.00 Number Served by PACT Teams and Intensive Case Management Teams                   2,350 Number of Individuals Employed Through Supported Employment                                320 Increase Access to Crisis Services by Tracking the Number of Calls to Mobile Crisis Response Teams                             7,950 Number Referred from Mobile Crisis Response Teams to a Community Mental Health Center and Scheduled an Appointment                                       3,700 Number Diverted from a More Restrictive Environment Due to Mobile Crisis Response Teams                                    7,250 Increase the Number of Certified Peer Supt Specialists in the State                       235 IDD Services Number of Individuals on Planning List for Home and Community-Based Services              2,850 Percent of DMH Institutionalized Clients who Could be Served in the Community              100.00 Percent of DMH Clients Served in the Community vs. in an Institutional Setting                                          87.00 Number of People Added from Planning List to ID/DD Waiver Services                       250 Children & Youth Services Percent of Children with Serious Mental Illness Served by Local Multidisciplinary Assessment & Planning (MAP) Teams                                        3.00 Number Served by MAP Teams                             1,037 Number of Children & Youth that are Served by Wraparound Facilitation                 1,572 3% Alcohol Tax-alcohol/drug Prg Number of Residential Beds Made Available Statewide due to the Three Percent Tax Supplements                             226 Number Receiving Residential Substance Use Disorder Treatment                            1,665 Crisis Stabilization Units Average Length of Time from Mental Health Crisis to Receipt of Community Mental Health Crisis Service (Minutes)              1.50 Percent of People Receiving Mental Health Crisis Services who were Treated at Community Mental Health Centers vs. Institutions                                      98.00 Diversion Rate of Admissions to State Hospitals (% of People)                           90.00 Number of Involuntary Admissions                       1,900 Number of Voluntary Admissions                         2,200 MI - Institutional Care Number Served Adult Acute Psychiatric                  2,200 Maintain Readmission Rates within National Trends                                    5.00 MI - Support Services Support as an Overall Percent of Total Budget                                            6.15 IDD - Institutional Care Number of People Served in Residential IID Programs                                        695 Number of People Transitioned from Facility to ICF/IID Community Home                   14 IDD - Group Homes Number of People Served in the 10-bed ICF/IID Community Homes                             571 Percent of People Served in the Community vs. in an Institutional Setting                                          85.00 IDD - Community Programs Number of People Added from Planning List to ID/DD Waiver Services                       200 Number of People Enrolled in the 1915i                 1,100 IDD - Support Services Support as a Percent of Total Budget                    5.00 A reporting of the degree to which the performance targets set above have been or are being achieved shall be provided in the agency's budget request submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for Fiscal Year 2027. SECTION 6.  The Department of Mental Health and its facilities shall have the authority, within funding and spending authority appropriated under the provisions of this act to transfer funds to the Division of Medicaid in payment of Medicaid match and designate that the funds thus transferred shall be applied to Medicaid match obligations arising in the subsequent fiscal year. SECTION 7.  Any person within the Department of Mental Health who must work on a statutory holiday or any holiday proclaimed by the Governor may, at the discretion of the Director of the Institution and the Executive Director of the Department of Mental Health and within available personnel funds, be paid "call-back pay" in lieu of "compensatory time credit." SECTION 8.  Of the funds appropriated to the "Service Budget," funds are included for the support of community mental health services for Fiscal Year 2026. Provided, however, that none of the funds appropriated for the support of community mental health services shall be made available to any Regional Mental Health/Intellectual Disability Center which does not receive from each of its participating counties a dollar amount equivalent to what the proceeds of a three-fourths (3/4) mill tax on all taxable property in the county in Fiscal Year 1982 would have been or the amount of funds contributed to the center by the county in Fiscal Year 1984, whichever shall be greater.  By means of performance contracts, the Department of Mental Health shall disburse the funds appropriated in this section for services for the mentally ill, intellectually disabled and alcohol/drug abusers.  The State Board of Mental Health and the Department of Mental Health shall be responsible for selecting the types of services which shall be provided with the funds appropriated in this section, for developing and monitoring performance contracts and for holding contractors accountable for utilization of funds. SECTION 9. Ellisville State School is authorized to draw up to Four Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($450,000.00) from interest earned on funds invested in Ellisville State School Client's Trust Fund for the purpose of supplementing the cost related to supplies, property, and equipment in direct care. SECTION 10.  The Department of Mental Health and its facilities shall have the express legal authority, within funding and spending authority appropriated under the provisions of this act to purchase land for use by residential facilities operated by the department, either directly or by means of transferring funds to the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, and to transfer such funds to the Bureau of Building, Grounds, and Real Property Management for the purposes of constructing and equipping group homes for persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and/or substance abuse; constructing and equipping such other buildings as may be required for treatment of persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and/or substance abuse; repair and renovate existing buildings; and to construct, repair and/or renovate employee housing.  Any intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities (ICF/IID) constructed with funds authorized in this section shall be authorized to participate in Medicaid funding available for such services. SECTION 11.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Department of Mental Health shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2025.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process. SECTION 12.  It is the intention of the Legislature that none of the funds provided herein shall be used to pay certain utilities for state-furnished housing for any employees.  Such utilities shall include electricity, natural gas, butane, propane, cable and phone services.  Where actual cost cannot be determined, the agency shall be required to provide meters to be in compliance with legislative intent.  Such state-furnished housing shall include single-family and multifamily residences but shall not include any dormitory residences. Allowances for such utilities shall be prohibited. SECTION 13.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Executive Director of the Department of Mental Health shall have authority to transfer cash from one special fund treasury fund to another special fund treasury fund under the control of the Department of Mental Health.  The purpose of this authority is to more efficiently use available cash reserves.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the Executive Director of the Department of Mental Health shall submit written justification for the transfer to the Legislative Budget Office and the Department of Finance and Administration.  None of the funds transferred with this section may be transferred to the Central Office for Personal Services. SECTION 14.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act, Forty-five Million Seven Hundred Twelve Thousand One Hundred Thirty-eight Dollars ($45,712,138.00) is provided to the Department of Mental Health to expand those community-based services that will improve the State of Mississippi's compliance with the Olmstead decision of the United States Supreme Court.  Further, it is the intention of the Legislature that the Department of Mental Health shall have the authority to transfer such sums from this source as are necessary to implement or improve those community services that are more appropriately addressed by the Mississippi Department of Education and/or the Mississippi Department of Rehabilitation Services to those agencies for that purpose. Further, it is the intention of the Legislature that any sums received from this source that are not expended during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the Mississippi Department of Mental Health shall be reappropriated for the same purpose during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.  Further, it is the intention of the Legislature that the Department of Mental Health shall account for the expenditure of these funds in sufficient detail to clearly show the purposes for which such funds were expended.  The Executive Director of the Department of Mental Health shall report any such reappropriation to the Legislative Budget Office no later than fifteen (15) days after the effective date of the reappropriation. SECTION 15.  Of the funds appropriated in this act, the Department of Mental Health, with approval by the board, may contract with Community Mental Health Centers, or suitable entities, for the purpose of operating the Crisis Stabilization Units at Grenada, Batesville, Brookhaven, Cleveland, Corinth, Laurel and Newton.  The department shall provide quarterly progress reports on the operation of the Crisis Stabilization Units to the Chairmen of the Senate and House Public Health and Appropriations Committees. SECTION 16.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 17.  The Department of Finance and Administration (DFA) shall transfer funds back to the Department of Mental Health, upon the request of the Department of Mental Health, where  the funds received by DFA from the Department of Mental Health were special funds (neither general funds or bond funds) and where those funds are not required for the payment of costs already incurred on a building or repair project.  For the purposes of this section, the term "special funds" includes any state source special funds, including, but not limited to, funds from the Health Care Expendable Fund.  The duty of DFA to transfer funds back to the Department of Mental Health under this section applies to any funds described in this section that were transferred to DFA, regardless of the year that the transfer was made by the Department of Mental Health. SECTION 18.  None of the funds provided in Section 1, 2, or 3 of this act shall be used to pay Medicaid match for the eleven (11) Community Mental Health Centers. SECTION 19.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, it is the intention of the Legislature that Three Million Nine Hundred Ten Thousand Seven Hundred Two Dollars ($3,910,702.00) shall be allocated to the Crisis Intervention Mental Health Fund supported by General Fund court assessments. SECTION 20.  Of the funds appropriated in this act, the Department of Mental Health shall fund ten (10) Programs of Assertive Community Treatment (PACT) Teams and provide supportive employment for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities. SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any other provision, the Department of Mental Health shall have the authority to escalate its headcount for any additional operational needs related to Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds upon approval of the Department of Finance and Administration and the State Personnel Board. SECTION 22.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 and Section 2 of this act, it is the intention of the Legislature that continued funding at or above the Fiscal Year 2025 appropriated amount shall be provided for Three Thousand (3,000) slots in the ID/DD Home and Community Based Waiver program. SECTION 23.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated for the Department of Mental Health for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Fund, as appropriated in SB 3162, 2024 Regular Session, to the Department of Mental Health for the purpose of entering into a subgrant with Canopy Children's Solutions for the construction and renovation of the CARES Center, including the children and youth Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facility for Trauma Recovery, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026........ $ 20,000,000.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2025, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 24.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, One Hundred Sixty-four Thousand Eight Hundred Fifty-nine Dollars ($164,859.00) is provided for the Division of Autism Services created in HB 807, 2025 Regular Session. SECTION 25.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) is provided for the Special Olympics of Mississippi. SECTION 26.  With the funds appropriated herein, the Department of Mental Health is authorized to make payment for expenses incurred during Fiscal Year 2023 as follows: Vendor                                   Fiscal Year   Amount National Research Institute              2023          $ 14,500.00 National Council for Mental Well Being   2023          $    119.75 SECTION 27.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 28.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.